District of Columbia statutes.
42-1903.19

Merger or consolidation of condominiums.

(a)

Any 2 or more condominiums, by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection (b) of this section, may be merged or consolidated into a single condominium. Unless the agreement otherwise provides, if 2 or more condominiums merge or consolidate the resultant condominium shall be, for all purposes, the legal successor of all of the preexisting condominiums, and the operations or activities of all unit owners’ associations of the preexisting condominiums shall be merged or consolidated into a single unit owners’ association. The single unit owners’ association shall hold any power, right, obligation, asset, or liability of all preexisting unit owners’ associations.

(b)

An agreement of 2 or more condominiums to merge or consolidate pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded, and certified by the president of the unit owners’ association of each of the preexisting condominiums following approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each condominium required to terminate the condominium.

(c)

(1)

A merger or consolidation agreement shall provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the units of the resultant condominium either by stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which the reallocations are based, or by stating the percentage of overall allocated interests of the new condominiums which are allocated to all of the units comprising each of the preexisting condominiums, and providing that the portion of the percentages allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part of the preexisting condominium must be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the condominium instruments of the preexisting condominium.

(2)

For purposes of this section, the term “allocated interests” shall mean the individual interest in the common elements, the liability for common expenses, and the votes in the unit owners’ association that pertain to each unit.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title III, § 319
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(mm), 38 DCR 261
1981 Ed., § 45-1859.
This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02.